Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2203
Legislative intent.

The Nebraska Community Aging Services Act is intended to (1) define the state's long-term care policy and program for older individuals in all areas of the state, (2) define and recognize a system for planning, administering, and delivering such program, (3) provide for the coordination and integration of all community activities and services into a comprehensive, coordinated program, and (4) provide authority for state funding of such program.

Laws 1982, LB 404, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 58, § 5.